Illinois, session 104th, HB2627.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Mink 5Facility Disease Prevention Act. 6    Section 5. Findings; purpose. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds that: 8        (1) Minks' upper respiratory tracts are 9    physiologically similar to humans, which means minks can 10    become infected by, and potentially transmit to humans, 11    respiratory viruses, such as SARS-CoV-2, which is the 12    virus that causes COVID-19, and Influenza A virus subtype 13    H5N1, which is the virus that causes avian influenza. 14        (2) Minks' susceptibility to acquiring and spreading 15    both human and animal respiratory viruses renders them 16    potentially potent mixing vessels for generating novel 17    pandemic viruses. 18        (3) Animal management and slaughter practices at mink 19    facilities facilitate the spread of viruses. These 20    facilities confine large numbers of animals in close 21    proximity to each other, which promotes disease 22    transmission. The mink also experience extreme stress, 23    which increases the potential to shed and transmit viruses   HB2627 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08196 BDA 18246 b1    over extended periods. This risk is further exacerbated by 2    on-site slaughter practices that create additional points 3    of exposure. 4        (4) Tens of thousands of captive mink in the United 5    States, and millions worldwide, have been infected with 6    SARS-CoV-2, and there have been documented cases where 7    mink have transmitted a variant of the virus to humans. 8        (5) Influenza A virus subtype H5N1 has infected tens 9    of thousands of captive mink since 2022. In at least one 10    mink facility, the virus gained a mutation that favors 11    mammal-to-mammal spread, allowing it to spread from mink 12    to mink. 13        (6) Outbreaks of Influenza A virus subtype H5N1 among 14    captive mink across Finland led to the culling of mink to 15    prevent the disease spread amid fears of it mutating into 16    something transmissible between humans. 17    (b) It is the purpose of this Act to protect public health 18and human safety by requiring disease prevention and 19surveillance measures at mink facilities in this State. 20    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 21    "Department" means the Department of Public Health. 22    "Mink" means American mink (Neovison vison), European mink 23(Mustela lutreola), and any mink hybrid, whether alive or 24dead. 25    "Mink facility" means any operation in which mink, for the   HB2627 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08196 BDA 18246 b1value of their fur, are owned, controlled, raised, bred, 2propagated, kept, slaughtered, skinned, or sold. 3    "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation, 4trust, association, copartnership, society, or other 5organization of individuals and any other business unit, 6device, or arrangement. 7    Section 15. License for mink facilities. 8    (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, a person who breeds, 9possesses, or intends to breed or possess mink for the purpose 10of engaging in commerce with any parts and products of the mink 11shall obtain a license from the Department. 12    (b) License application requirements: 13        (1) Each mink facility must apply annually for a 14    license. 15        (2) Information required for the license include, at 16    minimum, all of the following: 17            (A) the full contact information for all owners 18        and operators of the mink facility; 19            (B) the address for each place of business where a 20        mink facility conducts business and the legal 21        descriptions of any lands upon which the mink facility 22        conducts business; 23            (C) all trade names under which the mink facility 24        conducts business; 25            (D) the number of individuals who work at each   HB2627 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 08196 BDA 18246 b1        mink facility; 2            (E) the number, sexes, and sources of individual 3        mink raised for fur within the previous year at each 4        mink facility; 5            (F) a detailed description of how the mink were 6        transported to and from each mink facility within the 7        previous year, including the route taken, if 8        applicable; 9            (G) the number of individual mink purchased, 10        transferred, or sold by each mink facility within the 11        previous year and the name of each person or entity to 12        whom or from whom mink were purchased, transferred, or 13        sold; 14            (H) a description of the size, number, and type of 15        the mink facility's pens, cages, or other similar 16        enclosures; 17            (I) a description of the barrier used to contain 18        the mink at the mink facility, as well as the barriers 19        used to prevent other animals from gaining access to 20        the mink facility; 21            (J) a description of the procedures the mink 22        facility uses to dispose of mink manure and carcasses 23        and parts of carcasses; 24            (K) a description of the practices and procedures 25        used by the mink facility within the previous year to 26        ensure the health and safety of workers, the public,   HB2627 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 08196 BDA 18246 b1        and animals on and around the facility; and 2            (L) the number of mink that died or were killed 3        within the previous year, the cause of death, and, if 4        killed by humans, the reason each was killed and the 5        method used. 6        (3) A license may be granted only if the Department 7    finds, following an inspection, that the application is 8    made in good faith with intention to actually carry on the 9    business described in the application. 10        (4) A license may be granted only if the Department 11    determines, following an inspection, that the facilities 12    are adequate for the business, and that: 13            (A) the facility is constructed to minimize 14        escapes or additional protections are put in place if 15        the construction is substandard; 16            (B) there are adequate security and safety 17        programs and procedures that minimize the possibility 18        of escape; 19            (C) there is adequate recordkeeping to aid in 20        tracking of confined animals or recovering escaped 21        animals; 22            (D) there are adequate procedures, equipment, and 23        trained staff to maximize capture of escaped animals; 24            (E) adequate veterinary care is provided to 25        identify and minimize the spread of diseases; and 26            (F) the applicant has a good reputation for care   HB2627 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 08196 BDA 18246 b1        of animals and compliance with the relevant laws. 2    Section 20. Licensee requirements. A licensee may maintain 3the licensee's license only if the licensee complies with all 4of the following requirements: 5        (1) The licensee shall, at least weekly, arrange for 6    testing for SARS-CoV-2, Influenza A virus subtype H5N1, 7    and other potentially harmful viruses, as defined by the 8    Department, in a large enough sample size of the mink at 9    the mink facility to determine with at least 95% 10    confidence that no animals in the population at the mink 11    facility are infected, and the licensee shall prioritize 12    for testing animals that appear sick or have already died. 13        (2) The licensee shall, at least weekly, arrange for 14    testing of all mink facility workers for SARS-CoV-2, 15    Influenza A virus subtype H5N1, and other potentially 16    harmful viruses, as defined by the Department. 17        (3) The licensee shall arrange for immediate testing 18    for SARS-CoV-2, Influenza A virus subtype H5N1, and other 19    potentially harmful viruses, as defined by the Department, 20    in any person who has been at the mink facility within the 21    immediately preceding 2 weeks and shows, or whose 22    household members show, signs of possible respiratory 23    infection, including fever or chills, cough, shortness of 24    breath or difficulty breathing, fatigue, muscle or body 25    aches, headache, new loss of taste or smell, sore throat,   HB2627 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 08196 BDA 18246 b1    congestion or runny nose, nausea or vomiting, and 2    diarrhea. 3        (4) If any workers at a mink facility or mink at a mink 4    facility test positive for SARS-CoV-2, Influenza A virus 5    subtype H5N1, or other potentially harmful viruses, as 6    defined by the Department, then all of the following 7    actions shall be taken immediately: 8            (A) The licensee shall quarantine the mink 9        facility and all humans and mink at the facility. 10            (B) The licensee shall report the positive test 11        results and any other relevant information to the 12        Department. 13            (C) The Department shall investigate to determine 14        whether, and to what extent, other humans or mink are 15        infected. 16            (D) The Department shall investigate to determine 17        whether, and to what extent, the virus is present in 18        any domestic animals, escaped mink, wild mink, or 19        other potentially susceptible wildlife on or within a 20        40-kilometer radius of the infected mink facility. 21            (E) The Department shall recommend to relevant 22        State and federal wildlife officials that the 23        recreational trapping of mink and other potentially 24        susceptible wildlife, particularly mustelids, be 25        closed in the area surrounding the infected mink 26        facility.   HB2627 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 08196 BDA 18246 b1            (F) The Department shall conduct a genetic 2        analysis of the virus to characterize the virus, to 3        detect possible virus mutations, and to identify the 4        origin and the source of the virus. 5        (5) A positive result for SARS-CoV-2, Influenza A 6    virus subtype H5N1, or other potentially harmful viruses, 7    as defined by the Department, at a mink facility, as well 8    as the results of the subsequent investigations, must be 9    made public by the Department as soon as possible. 10        (6) The licensee must ensure that each mink is 11    separated from any other mink by at least 6 feet to reduce 12    disease transmission. 13        (7) The Department shall implement additional 14    requirements for the disposal of feces, carcasses, and fur 15    at mink facilities if the Department determines it to be 16    in the best interest of public health. 17    Section 25. License fee. For each mink facility that it 18owns or operates, the licensee must, on or before January 1, 19pay to the Department an annual fee of $1,000. Proceeds from 20fees under this Section shall be deposited into the Mink 21Facility Fund established under Section 30. 22    Section 30. Mink Facility Fund. The Mink Facility Fund is 23hereby created as a special fund in the State treasury. Fees 24collected under this Act and interest attributable to moneys   HB2627 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 08196 BDA 18246 b1in the Fund shall be deposited into the Fund. Moneys in the 2Fund, including interest earned, may be used by the Department 3for administration and enforcement of this Act. 4    Section 35. Inspection. 5    (a) To ensure compliance with this Act, the Department 6shall inspect each mink facility annually before granting a 7license for the mink facility. 8    (b) The Department shall conduct an unannounced inspection 9at each mink facility no fewer than 2 additional times per year 10to ensure that the licensee is maintaining the licensee's 11license in good standing. 12    (c) Following each inspection, the Department shall 13produce a detailed report explaining whether the licensee 14complies with the terms of the licensee's license. 15    Section 40. Euthanasia. If euthanasia of mink is necessary 16for disease containment, either by the licensee or the 17Department, it shall be performed in a manner that: 18        (1) meets the definition of "euthanasia" specified in 19    9 CFR 1.1 (or successor regulations); and 20        (2) is not identified as aversive to mink in the most 21    recent version of the American Veterinary Medical 22    Association (AVMA) Guidelines for the Euthanasia of 23    Animals.   HB2627 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 08196 BDA 18246 b1    Section 45. Violations. 2    (a) A licensee who violates any provision of this Act or 3any rules adopted under this Act shall be subject to (1) 4revocation of the licensee's license under this Act and (2) 5confiscation of all mink at the mink facility. 6    (b) The penalty described in this Section may be enforced 7by the Attorney General bringing an action in a court of 8competent jurisdiction. The application of this Section does 9not preclude an action by the Attorney General seeking 10equitable or other remedies in connection with the enforcement 11of this Act. 12    (c) The penalties described in this Section may be 13enforced by the Department under a process that the Department 14may adopt rules to implement. This process shall comport with 15requirements for due process, requirements under the Illinois 16Administrative Procedure Act, and requirements under the 17Administrative Review Law of the Code of Civil Procedure. The 18provisions of the Administrative Review Law and the rules 19adopted pursuant to the Administrative Review Law shall apply 20to and govern all proceedings instituted for the judicial 21review of final administrative decisions under this Act. The 22commencement of any action for review shall operate as a stay 23of enforcement, and no action based on any decision under this 24Act shall be taken pending final disposition of the review. 25    Section 50. Rulemaking. The Department, in consultation   HB2627 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 08196 BDA 18246 b1with any other relevant agencies, as determined by the 2Department, shall adopt rules to implement this Act. These 3rules may impose stricter requirements for disease prevention, 4surveillance, and containment at mink facilities than those 5outlined in this Act if warranted by risks to public health and 6safety. 7    The Department, in consultation with any other relevant 8agencies, as determined by the Department, shall develop and 9maintain a publicly available list of potentially harmful 10viruses required for testing, including, but not limited to, 11SARS-CoV-2 and Influenza A virus subtype H5N1. 12    Section 55. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 13Section 5.1030 as follows: 14    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)15    Sec. 5.1030. The Mink Facility Fund.